South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3578.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-29-15(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) In addition to the requirements that writing and arithmetic be subjects of instruction in each school district pursuant to Section 59-29-10, each school district shall: (1) provide instruction in cursive writing beginning in second grade and continuing in third grade, fourth grade, and fifth grade to ensure that students can create readable documents through legible cursive handwriting by the end of fifth grade; and (2) require students to memorize multiplication tables to ensure that students can effectively multiply numbers by the end of fifth grade. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----